Alaska statutes. Title 5. Amusements and Sports.
Chapter 05. Athletic Commission and Commissioner of Athletics.

Administrative Code. —

For athletic commission, see 12 AAC 06.

Sec. 05.05.010.
Creation and duties of athletic commission.

There is created an athletic commission within the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development. The commission consists of four members appointed by the governor. One member of the commission shall be appointed from each of the four judicial districts. The commissioners shall be appointed for overlapping four-year terms. Members of the commission serve at the pleasure of the governor and shall be selected on the basis of their known interest in and knowledge of athletics in the state.

The commission shall act in an advisory capacity to the commissioner of athletics and shall perform other duties assigned to it by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 147 SLA 1959; am E.O. No. 60, § 2 (1985); am § 5 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 94 SLA 1987)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For the judicial districts referred to in subsection (a), see AS

22.10.010

.

Collateral references. —

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 224, 225, 254, 255, 256.

Bribery in athletic contests. 49 ALR2d 1234.

Application of state antitrust laws to athletic leagues or associations. 85 ALR3d 970.

Sec. 05.05.020.
Commissioner of athletics.

The governor shall appoint the commissioner of athletics to serve at the governor’s pleasure. The commissioner shall be selected on the basis of knowledge of and contribution to athletics in the state. The commissioner serves for a period of five years.

The commissioner shall, with the aid and counsel of the commission, adopt regulations governing athletics and athletic programs and contests as the commissioner considers necessary, expedient, and appropriate. The regulations have the force and effect of law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 147 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For professional boxing contest requirements, see 12 AAC 6, art. 2.

For wrestling matches and exhibitions, see 12 AAC 6, art. 3.

For facilities, equipment and supplies, see 12 AAC 6, art. 4.

For promoters and contracts, see 12 AAC 6, art. 5.

For club boxing contest requirements, see 12 AAC 6, art. 6.

Sec. 05.05.030.
Jurisdiction, duties, and powers.

[Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

Nothing in this chapter gives the commissioner or the commission jurisdiction over the athletes or the athletic programs of any elementary or high school or a college or university.

Each member of the commission shall attend and supervise all boxing and wrestling events in the member’s area unless an official inspector attends the event under AS

05.10.110

. A member may attend other athletic events in the member’s area that the member considers necessary. A member may provide for the attendance of a physician whose fees shall be paid for by the promoter or manager of the event.

History.

(§ 3 ch 147 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994)

Sec. 05.05.040.
Meetings and compensation of athletic commission.

The commission may meet at least once a year at the call of the governor. When called, the members of the commission may, at the election of the governor, receive travel expenses incurred in carrying out the purposes of this chapter. A member may receive the per diem allowance for time spent at meetings allowed by law or by executive order.

History.

(§ 4 ch 147 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 50 SLA 1989)

Cross references. —

For per diem allowances, see AS

39.20.180

.

Collateral references. —

81A C.J.S., States, § 204.